Wyoming statutes. Title 6 Crimes and Offenses
Article 2. Hindering Government Operations

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

§ 6-5-201.
Definitions.

As used in this article:

“Emergency” means a crime or a situation which could result in a public official responding in an authorized emergency vehicle or which could jeopardize public safety and could result in the evacuation of any area, building, structure, vehicle or other place people may enter;

“Official detention” means arrest, detention in a facility for custody of persons under charge or conviction of crime or alleged or found to be delinquent, detention for extradition or deportation, or detention in any manner and in any place for law enforcement purposes. “Official detention” does not include supervision on probation or parole or constraint incidental to release on bail;

“Relative” means a grandparent, grandchild, mother, father, husband, wife, sister, brother or child; and

“Render assistance” means to:

Harbor or conceal the person;

Warn the person of impending discovery or apprehension, excluding an official warning given in an effort to bring the person into compliance with the law;

Provide the person with money, transportation, weapon, disguise or other thing to be used in avoiding discovery or apprehension;

By force, intimidation or deception, obstruct anyone in the performance of any act which might aid in the discovery, detection, apprehension, prosecution, conviction or punishment of the person; or

Conceal, destroy or alter any physical evidence that might aid in the discovery, detection, apprehension, prosecution, conviction or punishment of the person.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Credit for time spend in substance abuse treatment facility. —

Since defendant could not be charged with escape if he had left the inpatient substance abuse treatment facility, he was not entitled to credit for time spent there. Yearout v. State, 2013 WY 133, 311 P.3d 180,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 139

(Wyo. 2013).

No “arrest” when merely intention to seize. —

In Wyoming, an arrest is effectuated when there is the taking, seizing or detaining of the person of another by touching or putting hands on him, or by any act which indicates an intention to take him into custody and which subjects him to the actual control and will of the person making the arrest, or by the consent of the person to be arrested. Such arrest must also be made under real or pretended legal authority and result in the actual or constructive seizure or detention of the person arrested or in his voluntary submission into custody. A person cannot be said to be under arrest when merely an intention or attempt to take, seize or detain him occurs, resulting in no seizure or control over the person. Phillips v. State, 760 P.2d 388,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 1988).

Resisting arrest, escaping detention, differentiated. —

Where the defendant escaped while police officers attempted to arrest him, he was entitled to an instruction which differentiated between resisting arrest and escaping detention following an arrest. Oien v. State, 797 P.2d 544,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 1990).

Temporary leave does not confer parole status. —

A prisoner committed “escape” for purposes of §

6-5-206

when he failed to return on time from a temporary leave granted him to talk with an attorney concerning a worker's compensation claim; his signing of a form captioned “Temporary Parole Agreement” before he was released did not convert his leave into parole under subsection (a)(ii). Westmark v. State, 864 P.2d 1031,

1993 Wyo. LEXIS 184

(Wyo. 1993).

Credit for time spent in Community Alternatives of Casper program. —

Following revocation of his probation, defendant was not entitled to presentence confinement credit for time served in a nonresident Community Alternatives of Casper program as a condition of his probation. White v. State, 934 P.2d 745,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 53

(Wyo. 1997).

Credit for time spent in Surveillance and Treatment Program. —

Where defendant was placed on probation and ordered to participate in Surveillance and Treatment of Offender Program (S.T.O.P.), defendant was not eligible for credit for the time spent in the program when her probation was revoked, since the defendant could not be charged with escape from S.T.O.P., and S.T.O.P. was not a community correctional center. Kupec v. State, 835 P.2d 359,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(Wyo. 1992).

Because defendant's participation in the Surveillance and Treatment of Offenders Program (S.T.O.P.) was a condition of his probation and he was not subject to official detention, defendant was not entitled to be awarded a presentence confinement credit for the time that he was in the S.T.O.P. Blouir v. State, 950 P.2d 53,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 155

(Wyo. 1997).

Credit for time in alcoholism treatment facility. —

When a probationer spends time at an alcoholism treatment facility as a condition of his probation, he is entitled to receive a credit for that time toward his sentence if a charge of escape from official detention will lie. Yellowbear v. State, 874 P.2d 241,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(Wyo. 1994).

Where defendant was arrested for felony attempted larceny and released from pretrial custody to participate in a residential substance abuse treatment facility, defendant was not in official detention for purpose of this section and was not subject to a charge of escape from official detention; therefore, defendant was not entitled to credit against his prison sentence for that time period.
Morrison v. State, 2012 WY 41, 272 P.3d 321,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 2012).

Jury not instructed prohibited conduct had to be undertaken voluntarily. —

Conviction for escape was reversed where cumulative effect of an instructional error and the prosecutor's misstatements Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-5-206(a)(i) created verdict that could not be trusted, because the jury had not been instructed that it had to find that appellant had acted voluntarily; even a general intent crime required a showing that the prohibited conduct was undertaken voluntarily.
Seymore v. State, 2007 WY 32, 152 P.3d 401,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 33

(Wyo. 2007), limited, Wyant v. State, 2020 WY 15, 458 P.3d 13,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 14

(Wyo. 2020).

Constraint incident to release on bail is not official detention. —

Credit for time served due to constraint incidental to release on bail has not been required by the Supreme Court of Wyoming, given the dictate of this section that such circumstances do not constitute “official detention.”
Morrison v. State, 2012 WY 41, 272 P.3d 321,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 2012).

Illegal sentence. —

Because Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 7-13-107(c) does not authorize the imposition of probation and detention at the same time, which are incompatible and mutually exclusive as indicated in this section and in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 7-13-401(a)(x) as construed together, a sentence that deemed defendant both on probation and in detention during release from jail for alcohol treatment was illegal.
Endris v. State, 2010 WY 73, 233 P.3d 578,

2010 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Wyo. 2010).

Applied

in

Lee v. State, 2 P.3d 517,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 68

(Wyo. 2000).

Quoted

in

Stephens v. State, 734 P.2d 555,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 413

(Wyo. 1987); Peper v. State, 768 P.2d 26,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1989); Craig v. State, 804 P.2d 686,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1991); Jenkins v. State, 2002 WY 107, 49 P.3d 1028,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 113

(Wyo. 2002).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 6-5-202.
Accessory after the fact; penalties.

A person is an accessory after the fact if, with intent to hinder, delay or prevent the discovery, detection, apprehension, prosecution, detention, conviction or punishment of another for the commission of a crime, he renders assistance to the person.

An accessory after the fact commits:

A felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than three (3) years, a fine of not more than three thousand dollars ($3,000.00), or both, if the crime is a felony and the person acting as an accessory is not a relative of the person committing the crime;

A misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both, if:

The crime is a felony and the person acting as an accessory is a relative of the person committing the crime;

The crime is a misdemeanor and the person acting as an accessory is not a relative of the person committing the crime; or

The principal is a minor.

No violation if the crime is a misdemeanor and the person acting as an accessory is a relative of the person committing the crime.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to harboring a sex offender, see §

7-19-308

.

As to age of majority, see §

14-1-101

.

Knowledge as element. —

Knowledge of whether the underlying crime is a felony is not an element of the crime of felony accessory after the fact. Bush v. State, 908 P.2d 963,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 230

(Wyo. 1995).

Denying knowledge of principal's involvement. —

Merely denying knowledge of the principal's involvement in a crime will not give rise to a charge of accessory after the fact. Stephens v. State, 734 P.2d 555,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 413

(Wyo. 1987).

Miranda warnings. —

Where defendant's post-Miranda, voluntary statement confirmed that defendant had provided false statements to the police with the intent to hinder, delay, or obstruct their investigation and render assistance to the assailant, the improper admission of defendant's unwarned statements did not have a substantial and injurious effect or influence on the jury, so the admission of the evidence was harmless error and defendant's conviction for accessory after the fact was affirmed. Lewis v. State, 2002 WY 92, 48 P.3d 1063,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 97

(Wyo. 2002).

Sufficient evidence. —

There was sufficient evidence that a suspect killed a victim and that defendant assisted in the killing as an accessory after the fact pursuant to Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

6-5-202

. Due to defendant's lack of credibility, her inconsistent stories, and the fact that the suspect had motive, a rational trier of fact could have found beyond a reasonable doubt that the suspect committed the crime with defendant's help.
Williams v. State, 2006 WY 131, 143 P.3d 924,

2006 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. 2006).

Stated

in

Jahnke v. State, 692 P.2d 911,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 351

(Wyo. 1984).

Cited

in

State v. Weekley, 40 Wyo. 162, 275 P. 122,

1929 Wyo. LEXIS 28

, 64 A.L.R. 420 (1929); Brown v. State, 953 P.2d 1170,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1998); King v. State, 2002 WY 27, 40 P.3d 700,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 2002).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For case notes, “Constitutional Law—Double Jeopardy—A Constitutional Protection or a Formality to Sidestep in Successive Prosecutions?
Harvey v. State, 835 P.2d 1074,

1992 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 1992),” see XXVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 661 (1993).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Acquittal of principal, or his conviction of lesser degree of offense, as affecting prosecution of accessory, or aider and abettor, 9 ALR4th 972.

§ 6-5-203.
Compounding; penalties.

A person commits compounding if, knowing of the actual commission of a crime or the violation of a statute for which a penalty or forfeiture is prescribed, he takes property or accepts an offer of property upon an agreement or understanding, express or implied, to:

Compound or conceal the crime or violation;

Abstain from prosecuting the crime or violation;

Withhold evidence of the crime or violation; or

Encourage or procure the absence of witnesses or testimony at the examination or trial of the crime or violation.

A person commits compounding of a crime or a violation of a statute for which a penalty or forfeiture is prescribed if he takes property or accepts an offer of property upon an agreement or understanding, express or implied, to:

Compound, discontinue or delay a pending prosecution for the crime or violation;

Withhold evidence of the crime or violation; or

Encourage or procure the absence of witnesses or other testimony at the examination or trial of the crime or violation.

Compounding is:

A misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000.00), or both:

Under subsection (b) of this section;

If a misdemeanor is compounded; or

If a violation of a statute for which a penalty or forfeiture is prescribed is compounded.

A felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than three (3) years, a fine of not more than three thousand dollars ($3,000.00), or both if a felony punishable by imprisonment is compounded;

A felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years, a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00), or both, if a felony punishable by death is compounded.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1.

No compounding of felony without proof of commission of felony.—

Crime of compounding a felony is a specific statutory crime, so that where no felony charges have been filed nor proof presented of the actual commission of a felony, no compounding of a felony can be found to exist. Dixon v. Williams, 584 P.2d 1078,

1978 Wyo. LEXIS 236

(Wyo. 1978).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

§ 6-5-204.
Interference with peace officer; disarming peace officer; penalties.

A person commits a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000.00), or both, if he knowingly obstructs, impedes or interferes with or resists arrest by a peace officer while engaged in the lawful performance of his official duties.

A person who intentionally and knowingly causes or attempts to cause bodily injury to a peace officer engaged in the lawful performance of his official duties is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than ten (10) years.

A person who intentionally and knowingly disarms a peace officer of his firearm while that peace officer is engaged in the lawful performance of his official duties is guilty of a felony punishable by imprisonment for not more than five (5) years.

For the purposes of this section only, “peace officer” means as defined in W.S. 6-1-104(a)(vi) and also includes any person employed by the state department of corrections on a full-time basis as a probation and parole agent or supervisor to assess, supervise, monitor, track, visit or control persons who are released from incarceration under conditions of parole or who are sentenced under conditions of probation.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3; 1983, ch. 171, § 1; 1995, ch. 130, § 1; 2008, ch. 103, § 1.

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, added (d).

Subsection (a) is not unconstitutionally vague,

although whether or not a particular action obstructs, impedes or interferes with the law enforcement officer in the performance of his duties is for the determination of the fact finder. Newton v. State, 698 P.2d 1149,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 477

(Wyo. 1985).

General intent crime. —

Because an accused does not have to intend a further act or future consequence beyond the injury to a peace officer, the completed offense described in Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-5-204(b) is a general intent crime.
Mowery v. State, 2011 WY 38, 247 P.3d 866,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 2011).

Highway patrolman empowered as peace officer. —

Section

24-12-103

clearly vests the powers of a peace officer in state highway patrolmen, and therefore any interference with a highway patrolman, while he is engaged in the lawful performance of his duty, is covered by the terms of this section. Tillett v. State, 637 P.2d 261,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 400

(Wyo. 1981).

Legality of defendant's arrest is elemental to his alleged crime.

Interference with a peace officer is not a crime unless the officer is “engaged in the lawful performance of his official duties.” Where the officer was not lawfully in the bar where the defendant worked, the defendant's conviction could not stand. Mickelson v. State, 906 P.2d 1020,

1995 Wyo. LEXIS 199

(Wyo. 1995).

Requisite intent to commit act can be inferred

from the facts and totality of the circumstances existing at the time the criminal act is complete. Tillett v. State, 637 P.2d 261,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 400

(Wyo. 1981).

Original intent irrelevant. —

Although defendant's original intent may have been to go to his mother in the courtroom and hug her, once the officers blocked his path and directed him to leave the courtroom and he lashed out at the deputy, swatting deputy's arm away, pushing him, swinging at him, and finally wrestling with the deputy, defendant's original intent was irrelevant. Nixon v. State, 994 P.2d 324,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 198

(Wyo. 1999).

Testimony as to prior bad acts admissible. —

Testimony of six police officers relating to prior bad acts of the defendant involving altercations with the officers was properly admitted to show intent and identity. Pena v. State, 780 P.2d 316,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 199

(Wyo. 1989).

Use of actual, direct or threatened force is not indispensable

to the commission of the crime of interfering with a police officer. Tillett v. State, 637 P.2d 261,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 400

(Wyo. 1981).

But mere remonstrances or criticisms of officer are not ordinarily sufficient

to sustain a charge of interference. Tillett v. State, 637 P.2d 261,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 400

(Wyo. 1981).

Although verbal abuse alone may become sufficient

to constitute the crime where its intensity, or the totality of several acts, is such as to amount to an inference with an officer in the performance of his duty. Tillett v. State, 637 P.2d 261,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 400

(Wyo. 1981).

Conviction issued prior to request for competency evaluation. —

Defendant was properly convicted of interference with a peace officer because his conviction was issued prior to his request for a second competency evaluation; therefore, the trial court did not err in failing to suspend proceedings and order a second competency evaluation. Marshall v. State, 2016 WY 119, 385 P.3d 304,

2016 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 2016).

Evidence sufficient. —

Evidence was sufficient to sustain a conviction for interference with a peace officer where defendant used abusive language to the officer, told that officer that the officer could not investigate a disturbance complaint, and positioned himself between the stairs and the officer. Brown v. State, 2005 WY 37, 109 P.3d 52,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 43

(Wyo. 2005).

Evidence, including deputy's testimony that defendant kicked him and testimony of defendant's roommate that defendant thrashed about and knocked a group down the stairs, was sufficient to convict defendant of felony interference with a peace officer in violation of this section. Regardless of which theory was asserted, defendant was adequately advised of the charge against him under U.S. Const. amend. VI and Wyo. Const. art. 1, § 10.
Hulsy v. State, 2009 WY 81, 209 P.3d 901,

2009 Wyo. LEXIS 101

(Wyo. 2009).

In a case in which defendant appealed his conviction for felony attempted interference with a peace officer, the Supreme Court concluded the evidence was sufficient to support the jury’s finding that a police officer was lawfully engaged in the performance of his official duties because defendant was a danger to himself, and that tackling defendant was not excessive force under the circumstances. In addition, the jury could reasonably infer from the evidence that defendant acted with the requisite specific intent when he attempted to disarm the officer by pulling on the officer’s gun with both hands. Latham v. State, 2021 WY 29, 480 P.3d 527,

2021 Wyo. LEXIS 36

(Wyo. 2021).

Peace officer interfered with by giving of false information. —

A peace officer was interfered with in the lawful performance of his official duties by the giving of false information by a person stopped for speeding who, when asked for his name, address and date of birth, gave his brother's name and birth date. Newton v. State, 698 P.2d 1149,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 477

(Wyo. 1985).

Person convicted of resisting arrest, even if warrant invalid. —

A uniformed peace officer is lawfully performing his official duty when he makes an arrest, even if it later appears that the arrest warrant is invalid. A person who resists such an arrest can be convicted under subsection (a). Roberts v. State, 711 P.2d 1131,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 625

(Wyo. 1985).

But when officer makes arrest without explanation, or presentationof warrant, arrest invalid. —

When an officer makes an arrest without presenting a warrant to the arrestee and without telling the arrestee the reasons for the arrest, the arrestee's resistance is far more understandable than it would be if the only flaw were in the issuance of the warrant. Under these circumstances, the arrest might be invalid. Moreover, when executing an arrest that is invalid for this reason, an officer might be outside the ambit of his official duties and the arrestee could not be prosecuted under subsection (a). Roberts v. State, 711 P.2d 1131,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 625

(Wyo. 1985).

Officer performing “official duties” while arresting for offense committed in his presence. —

A police officer had probable cause to believe that the defendant was committing a breach of peace as defined by a municipal ordinance. His arrest of the defendant was lawful, therefore, under § 7-2-103(a), because a criminal act was occurring in the presence of the officer. The bodily harm that the defendant inflicted on the officer while resisting the lawful arrest occurred while the officer was “in the performance of his official duties” and was properly punishable under subsection (b). Simmons v. State, 712 P.2d 887,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 449

(Wyo. 1986).

Arrest outside jurisdiction. —

Defendant's conviction for interference with a municipal peace officer was reversed, where municipal police were not engaged in the “lawful performance” of their official duties when they arrested him outside their jurisdiction. Van Horn v. State, 802 P.2d 883,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 1990).

Interference with unlawful search not prohibited. —

When an officer is acting without his legal authority, i.e., in conducting an unlawful search, one opposing him is not guilty of obstructing an officer. Storms v. State, 590 P.2d 1321,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 368

(Wyo. 1979).

General intent instruction, coupled with specific intent instruction, not error. —

In a jury trial for violating this section, the court did not err in instructing the jury “that people are considered by law to have intended the natural consequences of their acts” while also instructing it that the charged crime was a specific intent crime. While the second instruction was error, as this is a general intent crime, the first instruction relieved the prosecution of proving the element of specific intent and was proper for a general intent crime. Saldana v. State, 685 P.2d 20,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 317

(Wyo. 1984), cert. denied, 471 U.S. 1103, 105 S. Ct. 2331, 85 L. Ed. 2d 848, 1985 U.S. LEXIS 1824 (U.S. 1985).

Instruction as to crime elements. —

Convictions for interference with a peace officer and causing bodily injury to a peace officer were affirmed because, inter alia, the instructions accurately informed the jury as to elements of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-5-204(b) and the State's burden of proof, and provided a legal basis from which defendant could argue he was not guilty because he did not know an investigator was a peace officer.
Iseli v. State, 2007 WY 102, 160 P.3d 1133,

2007 Wyo. LEXIS 111

(Wyo. 2007).

Self-induced intoxication instruction unavailable. —

During defendant's trial for felony interference with a peace officer, in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-5-204(b), the court did not err in refusing to instruct the jury on a self-induced intoxication defense because the completed offense described in § 6-5-204(b) was a general intent crime and thus the self-induced intoxication defense was not available.
Mowery v. State, 2011 WY 38, 247 P.3d 866,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 42

(Wyo. 2011).

Court properly denied submission to jury of following purported self-defense instruction:

“You are instructed that there may be situations that … police activities are so provocative and resistance so understandable that it can only be concluded that the police were not engaged in the lawful performance of their official duties.” This instruction, which did not even allude to the defendant's self-defense theory, may have been adequate to apprise the court of the defendant's theory of the case, but was an insufficient statement of the law to give to the jury. Simonds v. State, 762 P.2d 1189,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 128

(Wyo. 1988).

Self-defense —

Defendant who testified she resisted a police officer's attempt to arrest her for drunk driving because she wanted to be free to calm her children was not entitled to a self-defense instruction. Yetter v. Wyo., 987 P.2d 666,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. 1999).

District court did not err by rejecting defendant's self-defense claim because the evidence did not show that the officer used excessive force in removing defendant from the vehicle. The record showed that the officer applied a compliance grip to defendant's wrist, which she testified hurt a little, and physically pulled her from the vehicle.
Cg v. State, 2011 WY 28,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Feb. 18, 2011).

Trial court did not err by refusing defendant's proffered theory of defense instructions, because the proffered self-defense instructions were either erroneous statements of the law, as they failed to indicate that excessive force could only be used against a peace officer if the officer used excessive force, or would have done no more than create confusion Tingey v. State, 2017 WY 5, 387 P.3d 1170,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 2017).

Lesser included offenses. —

In a criminal trial following defendant's charge of felony interference with a police officer, the court erred by failing to instruct the jury of the lesser included offense of misdemeanor resisting arrest. Mueller v. State, 2001 WY 134, 36 P.3d 1151,

2001 Wyo. LEXIS 160

(Wyo. 2001).

Resisting arrest, escaping detention, differentiated. —

Where the defendant escaped while police officers attempted to arrest him, he was entitled to an instruction which differentiated between resisting arrest and escaping detention following an arrest. Oien v. State, 797 P.2d 544,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 85

(Wyo. 1990).

Evidence sufficient. —

Where a police officer identified himself as a police officer and ordered the defendant to stop when he fled from a house, and repeatedly told defendant that he was under arrest, and the defendant ran away from the officer after the officer's unsuccessful attempt to hold him, and struggled with the officer as the officer tried to secure the defendant's car keys, the entire sequence of events constituted a blatant example of knowing interference and resistance to a lawful arrest.
Walter v. State, 811 P.2d 716,

1991 Wyo. LEXIS 89

(Wyo. 1991).

In a prosecution of defendant for felony interference with a peace officer, the State's evidence sufficiently supported its charge that defendant intentionally and knowingly caused bodily injury to a peace officer. The officer's testimony that a rather forceful kick from defendant struck the officer in the vicinity of his solar plexus, and that the impacted area of his body remained tender for a few days and hurt whenever his body armor contacted it was sufficient to establish that the officer suffered pain and bodily injury. Flores v. State, 2017 WY 120, 403 P.3d 993,

2017 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 2017).

Evidence was sufficient to support defendant's conviction of interference with a peace officer in violation of Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-5-204(a) because the officer was engaged in the performance of his community caretaker duties when he directed defendant out of the neighbor's vehicle and when he physically removed her from the vehicle. The record showed that defendant had refused to exit the vehicle despite numerous requests by her mother and the neighbor and the neighbor had requested the officer's assistance.
Cg v. State, 2011 WY 28,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Feb. 18, 2011).

Lawful performance of official duties. —

Where the officers knew of a phone call reporting a fight between a bartender and defendant who was identified by name, upon arrival defendant was standing by the bar having a heated verbal exchange with the bartender, there was broken glass on the floor, and defendant refused to comply with a request to speak with the officers outside and physically resisted removal, there was probable cause to arrest for breach of the peace under Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 6-6-102(a), and an officer was acting in the lawful performance of his duties when defendant kneed him in the groin, supporting defendant's conviction of felony interference with a peace officer in violation of this section. Mascarenas v. State, 2003 WY 124, 76 P.3d 1258,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 149

(Wyo. 2003).

“Lawful performance of official duties” not found. —

Where the police did not have reasonable grounds to demand entry to a bar pursuant to W.S. 12-2-304(c), and since the police did not have authority to demand entrance, appellant's refusal to admit them did not result in an interference with the performance of the officer's official duties. Mickelson v. State, 886 P.2d 247,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1994).

Since the court found that the police could not lawfully enter a bar pursuant to W.S. 12-2-304(c), they were not “engaged in the lawful performance” of their official duties, and appellant could not have interfered with them. Mickelson v. State, 886 P.2d 247,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 150

(Wyo. 1994).

Legality of officer's conduct. —

The legality of an officer's conduct is measured at the time the injury occurs; thus, where an initial inspection encounter between defendant and a game and fish warden had terminated, it was not relevant to whether the warden was acting lawfully at the time of a later incident leading to charges under this section. Nelson v. State, 960 P.2d 1011,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 86

(Wyo. 1998).

Probable cause to arrest. —

Police officer had probable cause to arrest appellant for interference with a police officer under this section, because appellant gave the officer a false name and refused to show his driver's license to the officer while he was investigating a hit and run accident. Appellant hindered the officer's efforts by putting his wallet back in his pocket, nudging past the officer, and heading for his apartment.
Vasco v. State, 2011 WY 100, 253 P.3d 515,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(Wyo. 2011).

In view of prior interpretation of statute suggesting that speech alone may rise to the level of interference with a police officer in the performance of his official duty, the officer could have held an objectively reasonable belief that plaintiff was interfering with his investigative detention of another individual in violation of Wyoming law. Culver v. Armstrong, 832 F.3d 1213, 2016 U.S. App. LEXIS 14583 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2016).

Qualified immunity barred an arrestee's claim that her warrantless arrest for interfering with a police officer was unlawful; it was not clearly established that the Fourth Amendment conveyed a valid privilege to actively resist an unlawful, warrantless search, and a reasonable officer could have believed that the arrestee violated this section by shutting the door to her home and telling the officer he could not follow her husband inside without a warrant. Starrett v. City of Lander, 699 Fed. Appx. 805, 2017 U.S. App. LEXIS 13935 (10th Cir. 2017).

Relationship to federal law. —

Where a defendant appealed his three-year sentence for violating
18 U.S.C.S. § 922(g)(1), his Wyoming conviction for felony interference with a peace officer in 2012, in violation of this section, was a crime of violence under U.S. Sentencing Guidelines Manual § 4B1.2(a)(1).
United States v. Winder, 926 F.3d 1251, 2019 U.S. App. LEXIS 17907 (10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 140 S. Ct. 559, 205 L. Ed. 2d 364, 2019 U.S. LEXIS 7210 (U.S. 2019).

Evidence sufficient. —

Evidence was sufficient to support defendant’s conviction of misdemeanor interference with a peace officer because he prevented the deputy from performing his lawful duty under the search warrant, as the deputy advised defendant that if he refused or obstructed the warrant he would charged with interference and defendant refused to allow blood to be taken from him. Garza v. State, 2020 WY 32, 458 P.3d 1239,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 2020).

Jury instructions. —

Trial court did not err by refusing to give defendant’s proposed jury instruction that a mere remonstrance or criticism of an officer was insufficient to constitute interference because, while defendant made statements that he felt he was being discriminated against and did not trust the officers, the record contained no evidence that he was charged with interference in response to those statements. Garza v. State, 2020 WY 32, 458 P.3d 1239,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 34

(Wyo. 2020).

Applied

in

Saldana v. State, 728 P.2d 1121,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 659

(Wyo. 1986); Croy v. State, 2014 WY 111,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 127

(Sept. 8, 2014).

Quoted

in

Phillips v. State, 760 P.2d 388,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 106

(Wyo. 1988); Pope v. State, 2002 WY 9, 38 P.3d 1069,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 9

(Wyo. 2002); Bowlsby v. State, 2013 WY 72, 302 P.3d 913,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Jun 12, 2013); Bowlsby v. State, 2013 WY 72, 302 P.3d 913,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 76

(Jun 12, 2013).

Stated

in

Griebel v. State, 763 P.2d 475,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 143

(Wyo. 1988); Cardenas v. State, 925 P.2d 239,

1996 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 1996).

Cited

in

Jessen v. State, 622 P.2d 1374,

1981 Wyo. LEXIS 283

(Wyo. 1981); Brown v. State, 944 P.2d 1168,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 1997); Mazurek v. State, 10 P.3d 531,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 182

(Wyo. 2000); King v. State, 2002 WY 27, 40 P.3d 700,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 28

(Wyo. 2002); Meadows v. State, 2003 WY 37, 65 P.3d 33,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 41

(Wyo. 2003); Wheaton v. State, 2003 WY 56, 68 P.3d 1167,

2003 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 2003); C.L.C. v. State, 2004 WY 2, 82 P.3d 1235,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 2004); Beck v. State, 2005 WY 56, 110 P.3d 898,

2005 Wyo. LEXIS 64

(2005); Harris v. State, 2011 WY 70, 250 P.3d 163,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 73

(Apr. 22, 2011); Matthews v. State, 2014 WY 54,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 60

(Apr 23, 2014); Saunders v. Hornecker, 2015 WY 34,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Mar. 5, 2015); Bd. of Prof'l Responsibility v. Haderlie, 2015 WY 90,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 102

(July 2, 2015).

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part one), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 107 (1984).

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Effect of invalidity or irregularity of process on criminal liability for obstructing process, 10 ALR3d 1146.

Right to forcefully resist illegal arrest, 44 ALR3d 1078.

Right to resist excessive force used in accomplishing lawful arrest, 77 ALR3d 281.

When statute of limitations begins to run on charge of obstructing justice or of conspiring to do so, 77 ALR3d 725.

What constitutes obstructing or resisting officer, in absence of actual force, 66 ALR5th 397.

§ 6-5-205.
Running manned roadblock; penalties.

A person commits a misdemeanor punishable by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, a fine of not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00), or both, if he proceeds or travels through a roadblock which is supervised by a uniformed peace officer without stopping and obeying the instructions of the peace officer.

History.

Laws 1982, ch. 75, § 3.

Law reviews. —

For article, “Goodbye 3-Card Monte: The Wyoming Criminal Code of 1982” (part two), see XIX Land & Water L. Rev. 509 (1984).